Missouri, session 2026, HB2685.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.407, to read as follows:
9.407. The week of September twenty-fourth to thirtieth each year is hereby
2 designated as "Historically Black College and University Diversity, Equity, and
3 Inclusion Week" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate
4 in appropriate events and activities to celebrate the goals of diversity, equity, and
5 inclusion as exemplified by historically black colleges and universities.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.